Hawaii statutes.
§431:19-304 Qualification of sponsors. A sponsor
of a sponsored captive insurance company shall be an insurer licensed under laws
of any state, a reinsurer authorized or approved under the laws of any state, a
captive insurance company formed or licensed under this article, or any other person,
company, or organization approved by the commissioner in the exercise of the commissioner's
discretion, after finding that the approval of that person, company, or organization
as a sponsor is not inconsistent with the purposes of this article. A risk retention
group shall not be a sponsor of a sponsored captive insurance company. [L 2008,
c 190, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 141, §10]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next